District of Columbia statutes.
21-182

Preparation of guardianship papers.

The Register of Wills shall prepare papers in connection with appointment of guardians to enable indigent minor children to enlist in the United States Navy as provided by law, without making a charge therefor.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 744, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 31(a)(4), 23 DCR 2544
1981 Ed., § 21-182.
1973 Ed., § 21-182.